Montana, session 2025, HB646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-2-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-2-101. Number, election, and term of office -- selection of chief justice. (1) The supreme court
consists of a chief justice and six associate justices who are each elected by the qualified electors of the state
at large at the general state elections next preceding the expiration of the terms of office of their predecessors,
respectively, and in a separate district by the qualified electors in that district at the election next preceding the
expiration of the term of office of the justice's predecessor. Justices hold their offices for the term of 8 years
from and after the first Monday of January next succeeding their election.
(2) After the general election in 2032, the chief justice must be selected by the majority vote of the
seven justices at the first meeting of the court in each year after a general election."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Supreme court districts defined -- number of judges. (1) In this state
there are seven supreme court judicial districts, distributed as follows:
(a) First district: Blaine, Cascade, Chouteau, Fergus, Hill, Judith Basin, Liberty, Pondera, Teton,
and Toole Counties;
(b) Second district: Big Horn, Carbon, Carter, Custer, Daniels, Dawson, Fallon, Garfield, Golden
Valley, McCone, Meagher, Musselshell, Park, Petroleum, Phillips, Powder River, Prairie, Richland, Roosevelt,
Rosebud, Sheridan, Stillwater, Sweet Grass, Treasure, Valley, Wheatland, and Wibaux Counties;
(c) Third district: Yellowstone County;
(d) Fourth district: Beaverhead, Broadwater, Deer Lodge, Granite, Jefferson, Lewis and Clark,
Powell, and Ravalli Counties;
(e) Fifth district: Flathead, Glacier, Lincoln, and Sanders Counties;
(f) Sixth district: Gallatin, Madison, and Silver Bow Counties; and
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 646

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 646.1
(g) Seventh district: Mineral, Missoula, and Lake Counties.
(2) There must be one supreme court justice selected for each district.
(3) The legislature shall review the districts after each decennial census for purposes of
maintaining districts with approximately equal populations while following county lines.

Section 3. Section 13-14-211, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-14-211. Judicial offices separate and independent offices for election purposes. (1) Each
vacancy for justice of the supreme court is a separate and independent office for election purposes. The chief
justice of the supreme court shall assign an individual number to the justices and certify these numbers to the
office of the secretary of state.
(2) Each vacancy for judicial office in a district that has more than one district judge is a separate
and independent office for election purposes.
(3)(2) Each vacancy for office in a county that has more than one justice of the peace is a separate
and independent office for election purposes."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Transition. (1) [This act] may not remove any justice that is holding
office on [the effective date of this act] during the term for which the justice was elected or appointed. After [the
effective date of this act], the chief justice shall assign each sitting associate justice to the judicial district that
corresponds to the associate justice's current seat number and certify these numbers to the office of the
secretary of state, and the chief justice must be assigned to the seventh district.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), each supreme court justice who chooses to seek
reelection at the end of the justice's current term shall run for reelection in the district to which the justice is
assigned under subsection (1).
(b) A sitting justice that chooses to seek election in a district other than the district assigned under
subsection (1) may run for election in the district if the justice resigns the justice's current seat effective as of
the date the justice files for election in the district to which the justice seeks election.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Codification instruction. [Section 2] is intended to be codified as an
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 646

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 646.1
integral part of Title 3, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 3, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 2].

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Applicability. [This act] applies to the election and appointment of
supreme court justices to terms that begin on or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 646